District of Columbia statutes.
2-1212.22

Requirements.

(a)

As a condition of participating in the Program, an individual or legal entity operating a grocery store shall:

(1)

Accept SNAP benefits;

(2)

Apply to accept WIC benefits and accept WIC benefits if eligible;

(3)

Enter into a first source agreement; and

(4)

Sell fresh produce and healthy foods.

(b)

A grocery store shall agree in writing to the conditions set forth in subsection (a) of this section for a period of at least 5 years as a condition of participating in the Program; provided, that this requirement shall not be enforceable if the individual or legal entity ceases grocery store operations.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-353, § 202, 58 DCR 746

History